Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.070

Motion to set aside indictment.

The motion to set aside the indictment can be made by the defendant on one or more of the following grounds, and must be sustained:

(1) When any person, other than the grand jurors, was present before the grand jury when the question was taken upon the finding of the indictment, or when any person, other than the grand jurors, was present before the grand jury during the investigation of the charge, except as required or permitted by law;

(2) If the grand jury were not selected, drawn, summoned, impaneled, or sworn as prescribed by law.

[ 1983 c 3 s 12; 1957 c 10 s 1; Code 1881 s 1046; RRS s 2099. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 1047; RRS s 2100, now codified as RCW 10.40.075.]